Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5901
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-5901 to 71-5909 shall be known and may be cited as the Assisted-Living Facility Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 45;

Laws 2019, LB571, § 1.